Tennessee, session 114, SB2320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-114(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (4) and redesignating the existing subdivision (4) accordingly:
(4) Expenditures of campaign funds to enhance security for a candidate or
officeholder's personal residence are not deemed for personal use. Expenditures
authorized by this subdivision (b)(4) are limited to twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per
calendar year and must be disclosed as "residential security." The candidate or
officeholder shall maintain all documentation pertaining to residential security
expenditures in accordance with § 2-10-212(c). In the event of an audit or investigation,
all information received by the registry concerning this subdivision (b)(4) is confidential
and not open to public inspection.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2320
010879
- 1 -